Washington statutes.
RCW 40.04.100

Supreme court and court of appeals reports—Distribution, exchange—Duties of reporter of decisions.

The supreme court reports and the court of appeals reports shall be distributed by the reporter of decisions as follows:

(1) Each supreme court justice and court of appeals judge is entitled to receive one copy of each volume containing an opinion signed by him or her.

(2) The state law library shall receive such copies as are necessary of each for the benefit of the state law library, the supreme court and its subsidiary offices; and the court of appeals and its subsidiary offices.

(3) The reporter shall provide one copy of each volume to each county for use in the county law library and one copy of the same to each accredited law school established in the state.

(4) The reporter shall likewise provide the state law library with such copies of volumes as necessary to exchange copies of the supreme court reports and the court of appeals reports for similar reports of other states, territories, and governments.

[ 1995 c 257 s 4; 1991 c 363 s 113; 1979 c 151 s 49; 1973 c 33 s 3; 1971 c 42 s 3; 1941 c 150 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8217-6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Washington court reports commission: RCW 2.32.160.